California, session 20252026, AB2553.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1203.094 is added to the Penal Code, to read:1203.094. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1203.1 or 1203a, if a defendant is granted probation upon a felony conviction listed in subdivision (b) that is related to the purchase or sale of real property, a mortgage involving real property, the recording or attempted recording of a real estate instrument, or a home loan modification, the term of probation may be extended for up to one year.(2) If a defendant is on formal probation, the period of probation may be extended if the probation department files a petition to the court and the court makes a finding that additional time is necessary for programming, in which case the court may order the term of probation to continue as necessary for a period not exceeding one additional year and under the conditions as it shall determine.(3) If a defendant is on informal or summary probation, the period of probation may be extended if the court makes a finding that additional time is necessary for programming, in which case the court may order the term of probation to continue as necessary for a period not exceeding one additional year and under the conditions as it shall determine.(b) (1) Subdivision (a) of Section 115.(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 115.5.(3)Subdivision (a) of Section 154.(4)(3) Subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 368.(5)(4) Section 470.(6)(5) Section 470a.(7)(6) Section 470b.(8)(7) Section 475.(9)(8) Subdivision (a) of Section 487.(10)(9) Section 529.(11)Section 529.5.(12)(10) Section 530.5.(13)Section 531.(14)Section 531a.(15)(11) Section 532.(16)(12) Section 532f.(17)(13) Section 533.(18)(14) Section 534.(19)(15) Section 639.(20)Section 2944.7 of the Civil Code.(21)(16) A violation pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1695) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.(22)(17) A violation pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2945) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.(23)(18) A violation pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8200) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(24)Section 27204 of the Government Code.(c) Nothing in this section is intended to preclude punishment under any other provision of law, including as provided by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 186.11.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.